Alabama, session 2026rs, HB319.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Sections 22-37-2 and 22-37-4, Code of
Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
"§22-37-2
When used inFor the purposes of this chapter and except
where the context prohibits, the following words and terms
shall have the following meanings:
(1) COMMISSION. The Alabama Environmental Management
Commission as created by Section 22-22A-6.
(2) DEPARTMENT. The Alabama Department of Environmental
Management as created by Section 22-22A-4.
(3) DIRECTOR. The Director of the Alabama Department of
Environmental Management.
(4) FEDERAL ACT. The federal Safe Drinking Water Act as
established by Public Law 93-523 and all subsequent
amendments.
(5) LEAD-FREE.
a. With respect to solder and flux, not containing more
than 0.2 percent lead.
b. With respect to the wetted surfaces of pipes, pipe
Page 2

b. With respect to the wetted surfaces of pipes, pipe
HB319 INTRODUCED
fittings, plumbing fittings, and fixtures, not containing more
than a weighted average of 0.25 percent lead.
(5)(6) PERSON. The same meaning as defined by in
Section 22-23-31(8) 22-23-31.
(6)(7) PLUMBING CODE. Any established ordinance or code
used to establish material standards and construction
practices associated with the plumbing of any a house,
apartment, or building.
(7) SUPPLIER OF WATER. The same as defined by Section
22-23-31(9).
(8) PUBLIC WATER SYSTEM. The same meaning as defined by
in Section 22-23-31(11) 22-23-31.
(9) SUPPLIER OF WATER. The same meaning as defined in
Section 22-23-31.
(9) LEAD-FREE. A solder or flux containing not more
than 0.2 percent lead and pipes, fittings, joints, or liners
containing not more than eight percent lead."
"§22-37-4
All formally adopted city and county plumbing codes
shall be amended within 12 months of May 10, 1988, to include
the provisions of this chapter for installation and repair of
plumbing facilities. All proposed plumbing codes shall include
appropriate lead ban provisions as determined by the
department, prior to adoption. Notwithstanding Section
22-37-7, all previously adopted city and county plumbing codes
that are inconsistent with the meaning of the term
"lead-free," as provided in Section 22-37-2, shall be amended
to conform to the term not later than 12 months after October
Page 3

to conform to the term not later than 12 months after October
HB319 INTRODUCED
1, 2026."
Section 2. Section 22-37-7 is added to the Code of
Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
§22-37-7
Any rule adopted pursuant to Section 22-37-3 or
prohibition provided in Section 22-37-6 regarding the import,
distribution, sale, or use of lead-free materials shall not
apply to any of the following:
(1) A pipe, pipe fitting, plumbing fitting, or fixture,
including a backflow preventer, which is used exclusively for
nonpotable services such as manufacturing, industrial
processing, irrigation, outdoor watering, or any other use
where the water is not anticipated to be used for human
consumption.
(2) A toilet, bidet, urinal, fill valve, flushometer
100 valve, tub filler, shower valve, fire hydrant, service saddle,
101 or water distribution main gate valve that is two inches in
102 diameter or larger.
103 (3) A clothes washing machine, emergency drench shower,
104 emergency face wash equipment, eyewash device, fire
105 suppression sprinkler, steam capable clothes dryer, or sump
106 pump.
107 Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
108 1, 2026.
Page 4